Louisiana, session 2026, HB25.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:784(A) and (C)(2) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§784. Payment of benefits
A. The retirement system shall pay all benefits in accordance with a good
faith interpretation of the requirements of Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue
Code and related federal regulations, as applicable to a governmental plan within the
meaning of Section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code. The payment of benefits
to or on behalf of a member shall commence not later than April first following the
calendar year in which the member retires, or attains age seventy and one-half years
the member's required beginning date, whichever is later. For the purposes of this
Section, "required beginning date" shall have the meaning set forth in Section
401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code.
* * *
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 25 ENROLLED
C.
* * *
(2) Paragraph (1) of this Subsection shall not apply to any portion of a
member's benefit which is payable to or for the benefit of a designated beneficiary
or beneficiaries, over the life of or over the life expectancy of such beneficiary, so
long as such distributions begin not later than December thirty-first of the calendar
year immediately following the calendar year of the member's death, or, in the case
of the member's surviving spouse, December thirty-first of the calendar year in
which the member would have attained the age of seventy and one-half years
reached his required beginning date, or April first following the calendar year in
which the surviving spouse reaches the spouse's required beginning date if the
surviving spouse submits to the retirement system at least thirty days prior to any
required distributions, or the deadline provided by federal law or regulation, an
acceptable election, as provided by the system, to be treated as a member for this
purpose. If the designated beneficiary is the member's surviving spouse and if the
surviving spouse dies before the distribution of benefits commences, then
Paragraph (1) of this Subsection shall be applied as if the surviving spouse were the
member. If the designated beneficiary is a child of the member, for purposes of
satisfying the requirement of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, any amount paid to
such child shall be treated as if paid to the member's surviving spouse if such amount
would become payable to such surviving spouse, if alive, upon the child's reaching
age eighteen or, if later, upon the child's completing a designated event. For
purposes of the preceding sentence, a designated event shall be the later of the date
the child no longer has a disability or the date the child ceases to be a full-time
student, or attains age twenty-three, if earlier.
* * *
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 25 ENROLLED
Section 2. The cost of this Act, if any, shall be funded with additional employer
contributions in compliance with Article X, Section 29(F) of the Constitution of Louisiana.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.